Connecticut, session 2026, HB05077.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That (1) subdivision (9) of section 10-262f of the general statutes be
amended to redefine "foundation" by (A) phasing in an increase of the
amount of the foundation from eleven thousand five hundred twenty-
five dollars to eighteen thousand six hundred eighty-one dollars over a
five-year period, and (B) adding a provision that adjusts such amount
in accordance with inflation, and (2) the general statutes be amended to
allow a municipality to lower its property tax rate so that the reduction
in property tax revenue is equal to the amount of the increase in
equalization aid grant funding such municipality receives.